Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-43] Fraud warning required.
(a) Life settlement contracts and applications for life settlement contracts,
regardless of the form of transmission, shall contain the following statement
or a substantially similar statement: "Any person who knowingly presents
false information in an application for insurance or life settlement contract
is guilty of a crime and may be subject to fines and confinement in prison."

(b) The lack of a statement as required in
subsection (a) shall not constitute a defense in any prosecution for a
fraudulent life settlement act. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next